Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Article 4. Publication of Decisions

Cross references. —

For other requirements relating to opinions, see §

5-2-110

. See also Rule 9.01, W.R.A.P.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

20 Am. Jur. 2d Courts § 147 to 178.

21 C.J.S. Courts § 170 to 177; 77 C.J.S. Reports §§ 1 to 13.

§ 5-2-401.
Authority to contract for publication of reports.

The supreme court of
the state of Wyoming is hereby vested with full and complete authority
to arrange and contract for timely publication of its opinions from
time to time, as may be required, and the legislature shall make adequate
appropriation to defray the expenses thereof.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 35, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 5-38.1.

§ 5-2-402.
Distribution of copies of reports.

The books delivered to
the librarian shall be
distributed as provided in this section. One (1) copy of each volume shall
upon
request be delivered to each justice of the supreme
court and to each district
judge there shall upon request be delivered as many copies as he has counties in his district.
The books shall be retained in the offices of said
officials and by them delivered to their respective successors in
office.
One (1) copy
may be furnished to the library of the supreme court
of the United States at Washington, one (1) copy to the office of
the attorney general of the United States, and one (1) copy to the United States district
court for the district of Wyoming. The remaining copies
may be used in exchange for the reports of other states
and territories and governments as
may be determined
upon by the justices of the supreme court, and a reasonable number
may be kept in the state law library.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 60, § 4; C.S. 1910, § 905; C.S. 1920, § 1134; Laws 1925, ch. 32, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 31-131; C.S. 1945, § 1-306; W.S. 1957, § 5-39; 2013 ch. 6, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment

, effective July 1, 2013, substituted “distributed as provided in this section.” for “used by him for the purpose of distribution as follows:” in the first sentence, added “upon request both times in the second sentence, substituted “The books shall” for “and to each state officer, said books to be labeled as the property of the state, and to”, deleted “the office of” preceding “the United States”, substituted “court” for “judge” near the end of the fourth sentence; and made stylistic changes.

Cross references. —

As to state librarian, see §

9-2-1026

.6.